Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,135.02
Changes under Laws 2003, LB 46; changes under Laws 2015, LB605; changes under Laws 2016, LB1094; changes under Laws 2018, LB841; changes under Laws 2023, LB50; applicability; legislative intent.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made to the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act by Laws 2003, LB 46, with respect to parole eligibility apply to all committed offenders under sentence and not on parole on May 24, 2003, and to all persons sentenced on and after such date.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made to sections 29-2262, 29-2266, 29-2281, 83-182.01, 83-183, 83-183.01, 83-184, 83-1,119, and 83-1,122 by Laws 2015, LB605, and sections 83-184.01, 83-1,100.02, and 83-1,100.03 apply to all committed offenders under sentence, on parole, or on probation on August 30, 2015, and to all persons sentenced on and after such date.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made to sections 28-105, 29-2204.02, 29-2260, 29-2262, 29-2263, 29-2266, 29-2267, 29-2268, 47-401, 47-502, 83-187, 83-1,119, 83-1,122, and 83-1,122.01 by Laws 2016, LB1094, and sections 29-2266.01 to 29-2266.03 and 83-1,135.03 apply to all committed offenders under sentence, on parole, or on probation on or after April 20, 2016, and to all persons sentenced on and after such date.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made to sections 83-1,110.02 and 83-1,122.01 by Laws 2018, LB841, apply to all committed offenders under sentence or on parole on or after July 19, 2018, and to all persons sentenced on and after such date.

(5) Except as otherwise provided in section 83-1,111.01, it is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made to sections 83-1,100.02, 83-1,110, 83-1,110.05, 83-1,111, 83-1,111.01, 83-1,114, and 83-1,122.02 by Laws 2023, LB50, apply to all committed offenders under sentence or on parole on or after September 2, 2023, and to all persons sentenced on and after such date.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 50;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 106;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 42;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 52;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 57.

The new parole eligibility provisions added by sections 47, 48, and 57 of 2023 Neb. Laws, L.B. 50, are not unconstitutional commutations as they do not result in substituting a milder punishment for the sentence originally imposed. State ex rel. Hilgers v. Evnen, 318 Neb. 803, 19 N.W.3d 244 (2025).